Utah statutes.
63A-5-801.   Memorials by the state or state agencies.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "State agency" means any of the following of the state that holds title
to state land:
(i)  a department;
(ii)  a division;
(iii)  a board;
(iv)  an institution of higher education; or
(v)  for the judicial branch, the state court administrator.
(b)  "State agency" does not mean a local district under Title 17B, Limited
Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or a special service
district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Utah Special Service District Act.
(2)  The Legislature, the governor, or a state agency may authorize the use or
donation of state land for the purpose of maintaining, erecting, or
contributing to the erection or maintenance of a memorial to commemorate those
individuals who have:
(a)  participated in or have given their lives in any of the one or more wars
or military conflicts in which the United States of America has been a
participant; or
(b)  given their lives in association with public service on behalf of the
state, including firefighters, peace officers, highway patrol officers, or
other public servants.
(3)  The use or donation of state land in relation to a memorial described in
Subsection (2) may include:
(a)  using or appropriating public funds for the purchase, development,
improvement, or maintenance of state land on which a memorial is located or
established;
(b)  using or appropriating public funds for the erection, improvement, or
maintenance of a memorial;
(c)  donating or selling state land for use in relation to a memorial; or
(d)  authorizing the use of state land for a memorial that is funded or
maintained in part or in full by another public or private entity.
(4)  The Legislature, the governor, or a state agency may specify the form,
placement, and design of a memorial that is subject to this section if the
Legislature, the governor, or the state agency holds title to, has authority
over, or donates the land on which a memorial is established.
(5)  Memorials within the definition of a capital development as defined in
Section 63A-5-104 must be approved as provided for in Section 63A-5-104.
(6)  Nothing in this section shall be construed as a prohibition of memorials,
including those for purposes not covered by this section, which have been
erected within the approval requirements in effect at the time of their
erection or which may be duly authorized through other legal means.
